Massachusetts, session 194th, S153.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 12 of chapter 118E of the General Laws is hereby amended in the first paragraph
by inserting at the end thereof the following new sentence:-
Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law to the contrary, the division
shall develop or amend any standards and regulations applicable to the personal care attendant
program to include as eligible members those individuals who are otherwise eligible for said
program, but who require supervision and cueing in order to perform two or more activities of
daily living.
of 1